Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1927
Admission of evidence of alibi; notice required; waiver.

No evidence offered by a defendant for the purpose of establishing an alibi to an offense shall be admitted in the trial of the case unless notice of intention to rely upon an alibi is given to the county attorney and filed with the court at least thirty days before trial, except that such notice shall be waived by the presiding judge if necessary in the interests of justice.

Laws 1993, LB 430, § 4.

This section does not allow a court to order the disclosure of the identity of a defendant's alibi witnesses prior to trial. State v. Woods, 255 Neb. 755, 587 N.W.2d 122 (1998).